Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska42-911
Department; victims; provide resource information.

The department shall provide complete resource information for victims and their families on legal, medical, financial, vocational, welfare, child care, housing, and other support services.

Laws 1978, LB 623, § 11.